inc/flattened/excel2fst/VAI.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+2Pl +3SgObv +3PlProx +Cnj +VAI +Incl @P.Prefix.ni@ +Dub +3SgProx +Excl %>%> @R.Prefix.gi@ @R.Prefix.NONE@ @P.Prefix.NONE@ @R.Prefix.ni@ +2Sg +X +Prt @P.Prefix.gi@ %<%< +Pos +1Sg +Ind +3PlObv +Neg +Neu

LEXICON Root
VAI_Prefix ;

LEXICON VAI_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ VAI_Stems ;
@P.Prefix.gi@:@P.Prefix.gi@gi VAI_Stems ;
@P.Prefix.ni@:@P.Prefix.ni@ni VAI_Stems ;

LEXICON VAI_Stems
maajiibatoo VAI_oo_Subclass ;
madaabii VAI_ii_Subclass ;
minongwaam VAI_m_Subclass ;
nagamo VAI_o_Subclass ;
nibaa VAI_aa_Subclass ;
niimi VAI_i_Subclass ;
wanishin VAI_n_Subclass ;
webinige VAI_e_Subclass ;
zaaga'am VAI_am_Subclass ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                               !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VAI, Stem Type = aa   !!
!!                                               !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_aa_Subclass
+VAI:0 VAI_aa_Flags ;

LEXICON VAI_aa_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAI_aa_NONE_WB ;
@R.Prefix.gi@ VAI_aa_gi_WB ;
@R.Prefix.ni@ VAI_aa_ni_WB ;

LEXICON VAI_aa_gi_WB
0:%>%> VAI_aa_gi_Endings ;

LEXICON VAI_aa_gi_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl:siimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl:siiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl:siim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg:sii # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl:siimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl:siiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl:mwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl:minaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl:m # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl:mwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg:naaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl:minaaban # ;

LEXICON VAI_aa_ni_WB
0:%>%> VAI_aa_ni_Endings ;

LEXICON VAI_aa_ni_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl:siiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg:sii # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl:siiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl:minaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg:naaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl:minaaban # ;

LEXICON VAI_aa_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VAI_aa_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VAI_aa_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg:siiwaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl:siiwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg:siiwanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv:siinigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx:siiwaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv:siinigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx:siigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl:siiwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl:siiwangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg:siiwaambaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl:siiwegibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg:siiwambanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlObv:siinigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx:siiwaagobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv:siinigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx:siigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl:siiwaangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl:siiwangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X:siiwiingibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X:siiwiingen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg:siwaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl:siweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg:siwan  # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv:sinig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx:sigwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv:sinig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx:sig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl:siwaang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl:siwang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X:sing # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg:siwaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl:siwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg:siwamban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv:sinigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx:sigwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv:sinigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx:sigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl:siwaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl:siwangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X:singiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg:waanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl:wegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg:wanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv:nigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx:waagwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv:nigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx:gwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl:waangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl:wangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg:waambaanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl:wegibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg:wambanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlObv:nigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx:waagobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv:nigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx:gobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl:waangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl:wangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X:wiingibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X:wiingen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg:yaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl:yeg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg:yan   # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv:nid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx:waad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv:nid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx:d # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl:yaang  # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl:yang  # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X:ng # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg:yaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl:yegiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg:yamban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv:nipan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx:waapan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv:nipan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx:pan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl:yaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl:yangiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X:ngiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv:siidogena' # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv:siidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx:siidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv:siidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx:siidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx:siigwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv:siinigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx:siigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X:siimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv:siiwa' # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv:siiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx:siiwag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv:siiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx:sii # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X:siim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv:siibane' # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv:siibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv:siibanii' # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv:siibaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx:siibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx:siibaniig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv:siibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv:siibaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx:siiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X:siimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv:dogena' # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv:dogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx:dogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv:dogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx:dog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx:gwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv:nigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx:goban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X:mwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv:wa' # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv:wan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx:wag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv:wan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx:w # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X:m # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv:bane' # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv:banen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv:banii' # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv:baniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx:baneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx:baniig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv:banen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv:baniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx:ban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X:mwaaban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                              !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VAI, Stem Type = e   !!
!!                                              !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_e_Subclass
+VAI:0 VAI_e_Flags ;

LEXICON VAI_e_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAI_e_NONE_WB ;
@R.Prefix.gi@ VAI_e_gi_WB ;
@R.Prefix.ni@ VAI_e_ni_WB ;

LEXICON VAI_e_gi_WB
0:%>%> VAI_e_gi_Endings ;

LEXICON VAI_e_gi_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl:siimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl:siiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl:siim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg:sii # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl:siimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl:siiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl:mwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl:minaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl:m # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl:mwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg:naaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl:minaaban # ;

LEXICON VAI_e_ni_WB
0:%>%> VAI_e_ni_Endings ;

LEXICON VAI_e_ni_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl:siiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg:sii # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl:siiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl:minaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg:naaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl:minaaban # ;

LEXICON VAI_e_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VAI_e_NONE_Endings ;
